Utah statutes.
58-9-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  doing any of the following to prepare a dead human body for disposition unless licensed as a funeral service director or a funeral service intern:

(a)  embalming;

(b)  calcinating;

(c)  pulverizing;

(d)  cremating; or

(e)  using any method that invades a dead human body;

(2)  using the title "funeral service director," "funeral service intern," "preneed funeral service sales agent," or "funeral service establishment" unless licensed under this chapter;

(3)  engaging in, providing, or agreeing to provide funeral arrangements to be provided under a preneed funeral arrangement without first obtaining a license as a funeral service establishment under this chapter;

(4)  engaging in selling, representing for sale, or in any other way offering to sell any contract under which preneed funeral arrangements are to be provided without first obtaining a license under this chapter as:

(a)  a preneed funeral arrangement sales agent; or

(b)  a funeral service director; and

(5)  failing to comply with Section 58-9-702.



Amended by Chapter 144, 2007 General Session

